Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.170

Payment of assessments required before purchase, receipt or shipment of fruit.

Such assessments will be due from the producers. No person shall purchase, or receive for sale, or shipment out of state any tree fruits subject to the provisions of this chapter until he or she has received proof that the assessment due and payable the commission has been paid.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6031; 1969 c 129 s 17.]